Massachusetts, session 194th, S2868.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1E of chapter 15 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the third sentence.
SECTION 2. The Chief Secretary of Boards and Commissions, in consultation with the
Secretary of Education, shall study the current composition of the board of elementary and
secondary education and shall consider best practices for constituting an effective board of
elementary and secondary education, and make recommendations for how the composition may
be changed. The study shall include, but not be limited to, consideration of (i) geographic
representation of board members, (ii) representation of different roles, skill sets, and experiences
amongst board members, (iii) whether certain seats on the board shall be reserved for certain
roles such as current or former educators, school administrators, or school committee members.
The Chief Secretary of Boards and Commissions shall submit a written report of their findings
and recommendations to the Clerks of the Senate and the House of Representatives and the
Senate Chair and House Chair of the Joint Committee on Education no later than December 31,
2026.
of 1